Washington statutes.
RCW 43.101.157

Tribal police officer certification.

(1) Tribal governments may voluntarily request certification for their police officers. Tribal governments requesting certification for their police officers must enter into a written agreement with the commission. The agreement must require the tribal law enforcement agency and its officers to comply with all of the requirements for granting, denying, and revoking certification as those requirements are applied to peace officers certified under this chapter and the rules of the commission. To ensure clarity regarding the requirements with which the tribal government and its police officers must comply should the tribal government request certification, a tribal government may first request consultation with the commission.

(2) Officers making application for certification as tribal police officers shall meet the requirements of this chapter and the rules of the commission as those requirements are applied to certification of peace officers. Application for certification as a tribal police officer shall be accepted and processed in the same manner as those for certification of peace officers.

[ 2021 c 323 s 14; 2006 c 22 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Severability—2006 c 22: See notes following RCW 43.101.085.